Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.030

Redistricting commission—Membership—Chairperson—Vacancies.

A redistricting commission shall be established in January of each year ending in one to accomplish state legislative and congressional redistricting. The five-member commission shall be appointed as follows:

(1) Each legislative leader of the two largest political parties in each house of the legislature shall appoint one voting member to the commission by January 15th of each year ending in one.

(2) The four legislators appointing commission members pursuant to this section shall certify their appointments to the chief election officer. If an appointing legislator does not certify an appointment by January 15th of each year ending in one, within five days the supreme court shall certify an appointment to the chief election officer.

(3) No later than January 31st of the year of their selection, the four appointed members, by an affirmative vote of at least three, shall appoint and certify to the chief election officer the nonvoting fifth member who shall act as the commission's chairperson. If by January 31st of the year of their selection three of the four voting members fail to elect a chairperson, the supreme court shall within five days certify an appointment to the chief election officer. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the person who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the vacancy occurs.

[ 1984 c 13 s 1; 1983 c 16 s 3.]